District of Columbia statutes.
49-408

Disbanding companies below minimum strength.

When any company of the National Guard shall, for a period of not less than 90 days, contain less than the required number of enlisted men, or upon a duly ordered inspection, shall be found to have fallen below a proper standard of efficiency, the Commanding General may, with consent of the President, either disband such company or consolidate it with any other company of the National Guard, and grant an honorable discharge to the supernumerary officers and noncommissioned officers produced by such consolidation. Officers and enlisted men discharged by reason of such disbanding or consolidation and at any time thereafter reentering the service shall have allowed to them, as part of their term of service, the time already served.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 774, ch. 328, § 18
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 630, ch. 146, § 12
June 3, 1916, 39 Stat. 200, ch. 134, § 68

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-108.
1973 Ed., § 39-111.